Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.210

Fees—University of Washington—Disposition of building fees.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5195-S.SL) ***

Within 35 days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as follows:

One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account." The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(5). During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2023-2025 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

[ 2023 c 474 s 8024; 2021 c 332 s 7025; 2019 c 413 s 7023; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 952; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7027; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7026; 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7022. Prior: 2009 c 499 s 1; 2009 c 497 s 6019; 1985 c 390 s 20; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.15.210; prior: 1963 c 224 s 1; 1959 c 193 s 7; 1957 c 254 s 6; 1947 c 243 s 2; 1945 c 187 s 2; 1939 c 156 s 1; 1933 c 169 s 2; 1921 c 139 s 2; 1919 c 63 s 2; 1915 c 66 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4547. Formerly RCW 28.77.040.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2023 c 474: See notes following RCW 28A.320.330.

Effective date—2021 c 332: See note following RCW 43.19.501.

Effective date—2019 c 413: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 21, 2019]." [ 2019 c 413 s 7041.]

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 43.160.080.

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 43.34.080.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 48: See note following RCW 39.35B.050.

Effective date—2009 c 497: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 15, 2009], except for sections 6020, 6021, and 6024 through 6027 of this act which take effect July 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 497 s 6055.]